Massachusetts, session 194th, S2756.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 47 the following section:-
Section 48. (a) Each public institution of higher education campus that provides housing
for students shall establish a college campus recovery-focused housing program to provide an
alcohol and drug-free environment for students recovering from substance use disorder. This
program shall provide services including, but not limited to, trauma informed on-site counseling,
mentoring and peer support.
(b) Each public institution of higher education campus shall provide overdose training to
all students, faculty and staff and shall make opioid receptor antagonists available for the
purpose of treating overdoses, as appropriate, including, but not limited to, providing opioid
receptor antagonists to resident assistants employed by said campuses. Campuses may
collaborate with other higher education campuses or contract with external vendors, or both, to
provide said overdose training.
of 2

(c) Institutions may apply for any federal, state, corporate or other grant funding that may
be available to implement the substance abuse recovery housing program, overdose training or
access to opioid receptor antagonists.
(d) The department of higher education, in consultation with the department of public
health, shall adopt regulations and provide guidance to public institutions of higher education on
the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. Section 2RRRR of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the fourth sentence, the following
sentence:- Campuses of public institutions of higher education may also participate in the
program; provided that they have met the requirements of section 47 of chapter 15A and the
terms that the department of higher education and the department of public health may establish
for such contract.
of 2